Arkansas, session 2025, SB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Certified nurse aides providing in-home services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall authorize certified nurse
aides or certified nursing assistants who provide in-home services to
beneficiaries to perform additional care and duties if:
(1) The certified nurse aide or certified nursing assistant has
been appropriately trained on the skill that is being performed or assisted
with; and
(2) The beneficiary or the representative of the beneficiary
consents to the performance of the care and duties by the certified nurse
aide or certified nursing assistant.
*JMB222*
01/27/2025 12:48:27 PM JMB222

SB110
(b) This section does not apply to a certified nurse aide or certified
nursing assistant who is providing services in an in-patient setting or in a
skilled nursing facility.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendments, or other authority necessary to
implement this section.






























01/27/2025 12:48:27 PM JMB222